Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/et_affix.dat
SFX D   en                   nasse                [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nas                  [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nast                 [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nale                 [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nal                  [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nalt                 [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   naks                 [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nani                 [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nana                 [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nata                 [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   naga                 [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   natesse              [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nates                [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   natest               [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   natele               [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   natel                [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   natelt               [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nateks               [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nateni               [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   natena               [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nateta               [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   natega               [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   naisse               [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nais                 [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   naist                [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   naile                [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nail                 [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nailt                [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   naiks                [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   naini                [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   naina                [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   naita                [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   naiga                [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nad                  [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   naid                 [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nate                 [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   nam                  [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   en                   naim                 [dgklnprst]en
SFX D   er                   ra                   [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   rat                  [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   rasse                [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   ras                  [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   rast                 [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   rale                 [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   ral                  [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   ralt                 [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   raks                 [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   rani                 [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   rana                 [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   rata                 [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   raga                 [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   ratesse              [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   rates                [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   ratest               [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   ratele               [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   ratel                [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   ratelt               [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   rateks               [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   rateni               [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   ratena               [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   rateta               [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   ratega               [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   raisse               [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   rais                 [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   raist                [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   raile                [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   rail                 [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   railt                [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   raiks                [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   raini                [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   raina                [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   raita                [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   raiga                [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   rad                  [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   raid                 [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   rate                 [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   ram                  [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   er                   raim                 [dgklnprst]er
SFX D   ev                   va                   [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vat                  [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vasse                [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vas                  [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vast                 [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vale                 [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   val                  [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   valt                 [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vaks                 [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vani                 [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vana                 [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vata                 [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vaga                 [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vatesse              [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vates                [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vatest               [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vatele               [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vatel                [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vatelt               [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vateks               [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vateni               [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vatena               [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vateta               [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vatega               [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vaisse               [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vais                 [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vaist                [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vaile                [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vail                 [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vailt                [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vaiks                [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vaini                [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vaina                [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vaita                [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vaiga                [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vad                  [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vaid                 [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vate                 [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vam                  [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   ev                   vaim                 [dgklnprst]ev
SFX D   0                    a                    [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    at                   [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    asse                 [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    as                   [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    ast                  [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    ale                  [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    al                   [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    alt                  [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    aks                  [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    ani                  [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    ana                  [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    ata                  [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    aga                  [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    atesse               [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    ates                 [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    atest                [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    atele                [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    atel                 [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    atelt                [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    ateks                [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    ateni                [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    atena                [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    ateta                [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    atega                [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    aisse                [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    ais                  [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    aist                 [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    aile                 [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    ail                  [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    ailt                 [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    aiks                 [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    aini                 [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    aina                 [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    aita                 [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    aiga                 [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    ad                   [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    ate                  [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    aid                  [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    am                   [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   0                    aim                  [aeioõäö][aeinouäö][dlsv]
SFX D   ne                   se                   [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   set                  [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   sesse                [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   ses                  [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   sest                 [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   sele                 [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   sel                  [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   selt                 [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   seks                 [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   seni                 [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   sena                 [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   seta                 [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   sega                 [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   setesse              [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   setes                [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   setest               [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   setele               [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   setel                [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   setelt               [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
SFX D   ne                   seteks               [bdfgklmnprstv]ne
